Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 2. HEALTH

SUBTITLE F. LOCAL REGULATION OF PUBLIC HEALTH

CHAPTER 120. TASK FORCE OF BORDER HEALTH OFFICIALS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 120.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Border region" means the area consisting of the counties immediately adjacent to the international boundary between the United States and Mexico.

(2) "Task force" means the Task Force of Border Health Officials.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 120.002. SUNSET PROVISION. The task force is subject to Chapter 325, Government Code (Texas Sunset Act). Unless continued in existence as provided by that chapter, the task force is abolished and this chapter expires September 1, 2029.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 120.051. TASK FORCE; DUTIES. (a) The department shall establish the Task Force of Border Health Officials to advise the commissioner:

(1) on policy priorities addressing major issues affecting the border region residents' health and health conditions;

(2) on raising public awareness of the issues described by Subdivision (1); and

(3) on other health issues impacting the border region as determined by the commissioner, including:

(A) barriers to accessing health care;

(B) health problems affecting the region, including:

(i) diabetes;

(ii) infant mortality;

(iii) heart disease and stroke;

(iv) obesity;

(v) cervical cancer; and

(vi) communicable diseases, including tuberculosis;

(C) factors that impede access to health care, including:

(i) socioeconomic conditions;

(ii) linguistic and cultural barriers;

(iii) low population density; and

(iv) lack of health insurance;

(D) surveillance and tracking of communicable diseases, environmental factors, and other factors negatively influencing health;

(E) standardization of data to ensure compatibility with data collected by border states on both sides of the international border with Mexico;

(F) public health infrastructure that includes education and research institutions to train culturally competent health care providers;

(G) establishment of local and regional public health programs that build on local resources and maximize the use of public dollars to address the needs of the indigent population; and

(H) collaboration and cooperation with Mexican counterparts of the task force at the state and federal level, and collaboration with federal counterparts in the United States.

(b) The task force shall study and make recommendations relating to the health problems, conditions, challenges, and needs of the population in the border region.

(c) The task force shall submit a report of recommendations to the commissioner for short-term and long-term border plans, as described by Subchapter C, not later than November 1 of each even-numbered year.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 120.052. COLLABORATION WITH OFFICE OF BORDER HEALTH. The Office of Border Health established under Section 12.071 shall provide staff support to the task force and any other assistance as needed or required by the task force, if practicable.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 120.053. COMPOSITION; TERMS. (a) The task force is composed of:

(1) the health department directors appointed under Section 121.033 from:

(A) each county in the border region; and

(B) each municipality in the border region that has a sister city in Mexico;

(2) two ex officio nonvoting members who are members of the legislature:

(A) one of whom is appointed by the lieutenant governor; and

(B) one of whom is appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(3) additional members appointed by the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner shall designate a chair and vice chair of the task force from among the task force members.

(c) The members appointed by the lieutenant governor and the speaker of the house of representatives serve three-year terms.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 120.054. MEETINGS. (a) The task force shall meet at least quarterly each fiscal year. Members may hold meetings by conference calls and through videoconference in accordance with Section 551.127, Government Code.

(b) Section 551.125, Government Code, applies to a meeting held by conference call under this section, except that Section 551.125(b), Government Code, does not apply.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 120.055. COMPENSATION AND REIMBURSEMENT. A task force member is not entitled to compensation or reimbursement for expenses incurred in performing the member's duties.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

SUBCHAPTER C. BORDER HEALTH IMPROVEMENT PLAN

Sec. 120.101. SHORT-TERM AND LONG-TERM PLANS. (a) The task force shall make recommendations to the commissioner for short-term and long-term border health improvement plans. The short-term plan shall identify health objectives proposed to be accomplished before the fourth anniversary of the date the plan is adopted. The long-term plan shall identify health objectives proposed to be accomplished before the ninth anniversary of the date the plan is adopted.

(b) The commissioner shall review the task force's recommendations and, based on those recommendations, recommend short-term and long-term border health improvement plans to the executive commissioner, identifying specific health objectives that may be implemented under existing law.

(c) The executive commissioner shall adopt short-term and long-term border health improvement plans and direct the department to implement the portions of the plans that may be implemented within existing appropriations under existing law.

(d) Not later than September 1 of each even-numbered year, the executive commissioner shall submit a report detailing the actions taken by the task force. The report must include:

(1) the status of all projects and activities involving the health issues described under Section 120.051(a)(3);

(2) the funding for the expenditures; and

(3) recommendations for legislation necessary to implement the short-term and long-term border health improvement plans.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 120.102. APPLICATION OF OTHER LAW. Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the task force.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 120.103. ASSISTANCE FROM STATE AGENCIES AND POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS. At the request of the task force, a state agency or political subdivision of this state may cooperate with the task force to the greatest extent practicable to fully implement the task force's statutory duties.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 754 (S.B. 1680), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2017.